ATV  SAFETY 

S.  HRG.  110–1072 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, 
INSURANCE, AND AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

May  9,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

39–697 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director,  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director,  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  CONSUMER  AFFAIRS,  INSURANCE,  AND 

AUTOMOTIVE  SAFETY 

MARK  L.  PRYOR,  Arkansas,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 9, 2007 
.................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

and Gallagher, LLP 

Murray,  David  P.,  Counsel,  Yamaha  Motor  Corporation,  U.S.A.,  Willkie  Farr 
.............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Weintraub,  Rachel,  Director,  Product  Safety  and  Senior  Counsel,  Consumer 
.........................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Federation of America 

Page 
1 
1 

11 
14 

2 
4 

Coleman, Hon. Norm, U.S. Senator from Minnesota, prepared statement 

........

29 

APPENDIX 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

ATV  SAFETY 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  9,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, INSURANCE, AND 
AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:35  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor,  Chair-
man of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR [presiding]:  I  want  to  thank  our  panel  for  being 
here  and  I  want  to  certainly  thank  the  staff,  as  always,  for  doing 
a great job. 

Today  we’re  going  to  talk  about  ATV  safety,  and  before  I  intro-
duce  the  witnesses,  who  are  two  great  witnesses,  and  we  look  for-
ward  to  hearing  from  you,  let  me  say  that  we  have  a  lot  going  on 
in the Senate today, a lot of hearings, there’s a lot of floor activity 
on  a  judge  right  now,  and  some  of  our  Senators  we  think  will  be 
here as the hearing progresses, but we’re not 100 percent sure, be-
cause some just don’t have confirmation on. 

But  let  me  go  ahead  and  say  that  All-Terrain  Vehicle  safety  is 
a very important topic, this Subcommittee looked at this last year. 
We  looked  at  ATV  safety,  the  history  of  that,  and  how  cir-
cumstances have gotten us where we are today. 

For  example,  in  my  State  of  Arkansas,  ATVs  play  a  vital  role  in 
both  economic  and  recreational  contexts.  It  could  be  people  out  in 
the  hunting  woods,  or  it  could  be  work  vehicles  on  the  farm,  but 
nonetheless,  ATV  use  is  very  saturated  in  our  State.  I  know  for  a 
number  of  other  Senators  who  are  on  the  Subcommittee,  it’s  true 
as well. 

The current contingencies and requirements for safety, as you all 
know,  are  derived  from  action  plans  created  by  the  industry,  and 
predominantly  they’re  honored  solely  by  domestic  manufacturers. 
Recent statistics show that deaths and injuries related to ATV use 
continue  to  rise,  and  it’s  important  for  the  Subcommittee  to  con-
sider  the  role  it  can  play  to  assist  in  the  reduction  of  these  occur-
rences. 

Last  year  we  asked  the  industry  groups,  and  the  consumer 
groups  to  come  together,  hopefully  sit  down  in,  either  a  meeting, 
or  a  series  of  meetings,  to  build  consensus  on  proposed  legislation 
on how to address ATV safety, as we move forward. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I look forward to hearing from the witnesses about the results of 
those  meetings,  and  I  hope  we  can  have  further  progress  and  new 
developments in the future. 

Finally,  I’d  like  to  thank  Chairman  Stevens  for  his  interest  in 
this  issue,  and  the  rest  of  the  Committee  for  their  involvement. 
Senator  Stevens,  of  Alaska,  who  can’t  be  here  at  the  moment  has 
talked  to  me  separately,  over  the  last  several  weeks,  to  talk  about 
how  important  this  is  to  him,  obviously  it  is  an  issue  that  touches 
Alaska,  and  they  have  a  high  number—I  don’t  know  what  that 
number would be, but a high per capita number, certainly, of ATVs 
in his home state. 

What  I’d  like  to  do  is  introduce  our  two  witnesses,  give  both  of 
you  about  5  minutes  to  make  your  opening  statement,  and  then 
we’ll ask questions. 

First, Ms. Rachel Weintraub, Director of Product Safety and Sen-

ior Counsel, Consumer Federation of America. 

Ms. Weintraub? 

STATEMENT  OF  RACHEL  WEINTRAUB,  DIRECTOR,  PRODUCT 
SAFETY AND SENIOR COUNSEL, CONSUMER FEDERATION OF 
AMERICA 
Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Thank  you,  Senator  Pryor,  and  thank  you  for 

the opportunity to speak today. 

I  am  Rachel  Weintraub,  Director  of  Product  Safety,  and  Senior 
Counsel  at  Consumer  Federation  of  America.  CFA  is  a  non-profit 
association  of  300  consumer  groups,  with  a  combined  membership 
of over 50 million people. 

CFA  was  founded  in  1968,  to  advance  the  consumer’s  interest 
through  advocacy  and  education.  CFA  has  been  concerned  about 
All-Terrain Vehicle safety since the 1980s, when three-wheel ATVs 
dominated  the  market.  We  opposed  the  consent  decree  between 
CPSC  and  ATV  manufacturers  in  1988,  because  it  did  not  ade-
quately protect consumers. 

CFA  petitioned  CPSC  in  the  1990s,  and  in  2002,  and  challenged 
CPSC’s  abandonment  of  their  ATV  rulemaking  in  the  1990’s.  CFA 
and others prioritized ATV safety, because at least 136,700 people, 
including  over  40,000  children,  suffered  serious  ATV  injuries  in 
2005  alone.  Estimated  ATV-related  fatalities  reached  767  in  2004. 
In  2005,  ATVs  killed  at  least  120  children,  younger  than  16,  ac-
counting for 26 percent of all fatalities. 

At  the  June  2006  ATV  hearing,  Senator  Pryor  asked  the  testi-
fying  parties,  including,  among  others,  the  American  Academy  of 
Pediatrics, Consumer Federation of America and representatives of 
the  ATV  industry  to  work  together  to  develop  mutually  supported 
legislation.  During  the  following  September,  CFA  and  a  lawyer  for 
an  ATV  manufacturer,  provided  comments  to  each  other,  and  to 
Senate  staff,  on  an  ATV  bill  being  drafted  by  then-Senator  Allen, 
which  did  not  lead  to  the  introduction  of  a  broadly  supported  ATV 
safety bill. 

This  past  March,  CFA  and  AAP  met  with  Senate  Commerce 
Committee  staff,  who  expressed  their  desire  for  CFA  and  AAP  to 
meet with representatives of the ATV industry to find a consensus 
on  ATV  safety  legislation.  CFA  and  AAP  agreed—these  unprece-
dented  meetings  consisted  of  open  discussions  on  the  draft  legisla-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

tion,  and  on  broader  ATV  policy  issues.  These  meetings  were  can-
did,  productive,  and  set  the  stage  for  a  positive  working  relation-
ship. 

At  these  meetings,  CFA  expressed  its  view  that  CFA  wants  to 
thwart  a  safety  threat  before  it  becomes  apparent,  but  prioritizes 
working  to  solve  the  documented  hazards  of  children  riding  all 
adult-sized ATVs. CFA is concerned that efforts to deal solely with 
imported ATVs will have a marginal benefit to the health and safe-
ty  of  Americans  riding  ATVs.  The  focus  of  ATV  safety  legislation 
must be on all ATVs, no matter how quickly the import sector may 
be growing. 

CFA  is  concerned  about  legislation  that  would  require  all  ATVs 
to meet the SVIA/ANSI ATV standard, especially with its proposed 
provisions, the standards are far too weak to curb ATV deaths and 
injuries.  These  standards  are  changing  the  way  ATVs  are  cat-
egorized,  shifting  away  from  engine  size,  to  a  system  based  upon 
speed. No data exists to demonstrate whether children could safely 
operate  ATVs  at  the  speed  limit  suggested.  The  explanations  for 
the speed limits are based on consumer preference, not on medical 
expertise, or safety. 

The  draft  legislation  also  proposes  to  require  that  the  manufac-
turers or importers of ATVs that are sold in the United States file 
ATV  action  plans  with  the  CPSC.  These  action  plans  rely  on  fine- 
print  ads,  warning  labels,  and  recommendations,  enforced  at  the 
discretion  of  manufacturers.  This  voluntary  approach,  however,  is 
failing to curb the rising tide of ATV deaths and injuries. Further, 
since  CPSC  has  not  provided  compliance  or  enforcement  informa-
tion of these action plans to the public, it’s not possible to evaluate 
the effectiveness of, or even compliance with, these agreements. 

CFA  provided  the  following  list  of  policy  proposals  to  be  con-
cluded  in  any  meaningful  ATV  safety  legislation.  One,  make  the 
ban on the sale of adult-sized ATVs for use for children mandatory; 
two, institute guidelines for Federal lands that would prohibit child 
from  riding  adult-sized  ATVs,  require  the  use  of  helmets,  ban  pas-
sengers, ban riding on paved roads, and ban riding at night; three, 
create an incentive system in Federal law for States to pass strong 
ATV  safety  laws;  four,  ban  the  sale  of  three-wheel  ATVs,  issue  a 
recall  of  all  of  those  which  remain  in  use;  five,  codify  90ccs  as  a 
threshold  for  adult-sized  ATVs;  six,  require  improvements  in  ATV 
marketing;  seven,  establish  minimum  stability  requirements  for 
ATVs;  eight,  issue  a  standard  to  reduce  suspension  failures;  nine, 
improve  ATV  safety  training;  ten,  require  sale  of  helmet  with  an 
ATV;  eleven,  require  CPSC  to  conduct  a  study  evaluating  a  child’s 
ability  to  operate  vehicles  at  certain  speeds.  We  also  requested  a 
GAO study, increase for CPSC funding, establish mandatory stand-
ards  for  speed-limiting  devices,  require  improvements  for  brakes, 
requiring  seat  belts,  roll  cages,  headlights  and  suggested  language 
for a warning label. 

On  our  priority  issue  of  banning  the  sale  of  ATVs,  we  did  not 
find  agreement.  However,  we  did  find  some  agreement  on  the  fol-
lowing  issues:  Federal  lands,  incentives  for  States,  selling  helmets 
with  youth  models,  improvements  for  marketing  and  training,  a 
CPSC  study,  a  GAO  study  to—on  CPSC’s  compliance  efforts,  and 
increasing funding for CPSC’s ATV safety activities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

In  conclusion,  every  year,  more  people—especially  children—are 
killed  or  injured  as  they  ride  ATVs.  The  current  voluntary  ap-
proach to safety has allowed these deaths and injuries to increase. 
The  draft  legislation  would  merely  apply  a  flawed  approach  to 
every  ATV  sold  in  the  United  States.  The  voluntary  standards 
could potentially put children at even higher risk, by allowing them 
to operate faster ATVs. 

The  CPSC’s  rulemaking  is  similarly  flawed.  This  is  our  oppor-
tunity  to  prevent  families  from  losing  a  loved  one,  caring  for  a  se-
verely  injured  family  member,  and  incurring  the  vast  cost  of  med-
ical care caused by the use of a recreational product—the ATV. 

We  urge  the  Subcommittee  to  take  strong  action,  to  curb  the 

well-documented hazards of all ATVs. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Weintraub follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RACHEL WEINTRAUB, DIRECTOR, PRODUCT SAFETY AND 

SENIOR COUNSEL, CONSUMER FEDERAL OF AMERICA 

I. Introduction 

Chairman  Pryor,  Ranking  member  Sununu  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
thank you for the opportunity to speak today and for holding this meeting. My name 
is  Rachel  Weintraub;  I  am  Director  of  Product  Safety  and  Senior  Counsel  at  Con-
sumer  Federation  of  America  (CFA).  CFA  is  a  non-profit  association  of  300  con-
sumer  groups,  with  a  combined  membership  of  more  than  50  million  people.  CFA 
was founded in 1968 to advance the consumer’s interest through advocacy and edu-
cation. 

Consumer  Federation  of  America  has  been  deeply  concerned  about  the  safety  of 
all-terrain  vehicles  (ATVs)  for  many  years.  In  fact,  CFA  has  been  involved  in  ATV 
safety  issues  since  the  1980’s  when  three-wheel  ATVs  dominated  the  market.  We 
opposed the consent decree between CPSC and ATV manufacturers in 1988 because 
we  felt  that  it  did  not  adequately  protect  consumers.  CFA  petitioned  CPSC  in  the 
1990’s and again in 2002, and legally challenged CPSC’s abandonment of their ATV 
rulemaking in the 1990’s. The Commission denied our most recent petition, CP–02– 
4/  HP–02–1,1 which  requested  that  the  U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission 
ban the sale of adult-size four wheel all-terrain vehicles ‘‘ATVs’’ sold for use by chil-
dren  under  sixteen  years  of  age.  We  have  testified  before  the  Commission  on  two 
occasions  in  support  of  our  petition 2 and  testified  before  this  Subcommittee  eleven 
months ago. 
II. ATV Death and Injury Data 

CFA  and  other  groups  have  been  working  extensively  on  ATV  safety  because  of 
the  deaths  and  injuries  caused  by  ATVs.  According  to  the  latest  data  from  CPSC 
on  ATV  deaths  and  injuries,  released  in  November  2006,3 at  least  136,700  people 
suffered  ATV  injuries  that  were  serious  enough  to  require  emergency  room  treat-
ment  in  2005.  Since  2001,  there  has  been  a  statistically  significant  24  percent  in-
crease  in  serious  injuries.  Children  under  16  suffered  over  40,000  injuries  from 
ATVs,  representing  30  percent  of  all  injuries  in  2005.  Since  2001,  there  has  been 
a statistically significant increase of 18 percent in the number of children under 16 
seriously  injured  by  ATVs.  This  age  group  incurred  more  serious  injuries  than  any 
other. The estimated number of ATV-related fatalities reached 767 in 2004. In 2005, 
ATVs  killed  at  least  120  children  younger  than  16,  accounting  for  26  percent  of  all 
fatalities.  Between  1985  and  2005,  children  under  16  accounted  for  36  percent  of 
all injuries and 31 percent of all deaths. 

1 Consumer Federation of America filed the petition on August 20, 2002 along with the Amer-
ican  Academy  of  Pediatrics,  American  College  of  Emergency  Physicians,  Bluewater  Network, 
Danny  Foundation  for  Crib  &  Child  Product  Safety;  Kids  in  Danger,  National  Association  of 
Orthopaedic Nurses and the U.S. Public Interest Research Group. 

2 CFA testified in the June 5, 2003 field hearing in West Virginia and in the March 2005 hear-

ing on CPSC staff’s briefing package. 

3 U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  2005  Annual  Report  on  All-Terrain  Vehicle 
(ATV)-Related  Deaths  and  Injuries,  November  2006.  available  on  the  web  at  http:// 
www.cpsc.gov/library/atv2005.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

III. Cost to Society 

Our society suffers not only because ATVs cost the lives of almost 770 people each 
year in the United States. These deaths and the over 137,000 ATV injuries incurred 
each  year  also  cost  the  Nation  considerable  amounts  of  money.  An  analysis  of  ATV 
deaths  comparing  data  from  1999  to  2003  found  that  costs  associated  with  ATV 
deaths  have  steadily  increased.  Costs  associated  with  ATV  deaths  of  children  in-
creased  from  $493  million  in  1999  to  $723  million  in  2003.  Costs  associated  with 
ATV  deaths  of  adults  increased  from  $1,706  million  in  1999  to  $2,517  million  in 
2003.4 The vast and tragic costs in both human and economic terms compel govern-
ment action. With appropriate Federal and state regulations, lives as well as billions 
of dollars could be saved. 
IV. Failure of the Current Voluntary Approach 

CFA’s recommended policy solutions are premised on the fact that the current ap-
proach  to  ATV  safety—the  industry’s  self-regulating  approach—is  not  working.  Not 
only has self-regulation by the ATV industry led to larger and faster ATVs and more 
children  being  killed  and  injured,  but  each  year  the  number  of  deaths  and  injuries 
climb. These increases have frequently been by statistically significant margins and 
the  Commission  has  routinely  noted  in  annual  reports  of  ATV  deaths  and  injuries 
that  these  increases  cannot  be  explained  solely  by  rising  ATV  sales  or  usage.  The 
failure  of  the  current  approach  compels  CPSC,  Congress,  and  state  governments  to 
be involved, at least in part, through the enforcement of a mandatory standard. 

In 2003, the CPSC issued the latest in a long line of studies documenting the dra-
matic  increase  in  ATV  injuries  and  deaths.5 In  assessing  trends  between  1997  and 
2001,  the  Commission  provided  compelling  evidence  that  the  industry  is  failing  to 
protect consumers. CPSC concluded that: 

• ATV-related  injuries  requiring  emergency  room  treatment  more  than  doubled, 
rising to 108 percent from 52,800 to 110,100, while the number of ATVs in use 
increased by less than 40 percent. 
• Injuries suffered by children under 16 increased 66 percent to more than 34,000 
in  2001.  Meanwhile,  the  proportion  of  these  children  among  the  driving  popu-
lation grew by 13 percent. 
• Injuries caused by bigger and more powerful ATVs, defined by the Commission 
as  machines  with  engines  bigger  than  400  cc,  shot  up  567  percent,  from  3,662 
to  24,437,  while  the  number  of  these  machines  in  use  grew  by  less  than  half 
as much. 
• Less than 4 percent of injured ATV drivers received formal safety training from 
a  dealer,  salesperson  or  organized  training  program.  This  proportion  is  un-
changed since 1997. 
• More  than  40  percent  of  drivers  injured  in  2001  stated  that  their  ATV  did  not 
have warning labels or they did not know if it did at the time of their accident. 
• Nearly  90  percent  of  children  under  16  years  of  age  were  injured  while  riding 
adult-size ATVs, in spite of the industry’s voluntary policy not to sell these ma-
chines for use by children. This proportion is also unchanged since 1997. 

V. Weakness of CPSC Rulemaking 

CFA  is  profoundly  disappointed  with  CPSC’s  current  rulemaking  on  ATVs.  CFA 
objects to CPSC’s proposal to re-categorize ATVs from a system based on engine size 
to a system based upon speed. CPSC provided no evidence supporting that children 
can  safely  operate  ATVs  at  the  suggested  speed  limits.  Further,  we  are  concerned 
that  the  categorization  is  based  on  flawed  speed  limiting  devices.  Also  of  deep  con-
cern  to  CFA  is  that  categorization  based  on  speed  is  one-dimensional  and  ignores 
other  critical  factors  that  have  a  major  impact  on  the  safe  operation  of  these  vehi-
cles,  especially  as  they  relate  to  operation  by  children.  The  weight  and  size  of  the 
machine  alone,  as  well  as  in  relation  to  the  weight  of  a  child,  are  critically  impor-
tant factors that this proposed rule ignores. This rule would allow children to oper-

4 Helmkamp,  Jim,  Ph.D.,  MS,  FACE  Director,  West  Virginia  University  Injury  Control  Re-
search  Center,  Research  Professor,  Department  of  Community  Medicine  West  Virginia  Univer-
sity, Lawrence, Bruce A, Ph.D., Pacific Institute for Research and Evaluation, Calverton, Mary-
land published a letter to the editor with appeared in Pediatrics 2007; 119(1):223–225. The au-
thors used the National Highway Traffic Administration model for determining the economic im-
pact. This incorporates work loss and quality of life components to estimate the cost of reported 
ATV-related fatalities. The assumption was made that ATVs are motor vehicles, and in the ab-
sence of a specific model for ATV-related fatalities, the NHTSA model is used for ATV crashes. 
5 Levenson,  Mark  S.,  U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  ‘‘All  Terrain  Vehicle  2001 

Injury and Exposure Studies,’’ January 2003. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

ate  ATVs  that  have  higher  maximum  speeds  than  what  is  currently  suggested.  No 
data supports moving in this dangerous direction. 

We  also  have  concerns  about  the  lack  of  safety  data  supporting  the  creation  of 
ATVs  designed  for  two  riders  and  the  lack  of  lateral  stability  requirements.  CFA 
fears  that  this  rule  will  not  only  fail  to  curb  the  rising  tide  of  deaths  and  injuries 
but could even place children even more at risk. 
VI. Benefit of a Federal ATV Safety Law 
A. Children Should Not Ride Adult-Size ATVs 

The  Commission,  as  well  as  the  American  Academy  of  Pediatrics  (AAP),  the 
American  Academy  of  Orthopaedic  Surgeons  (AAOS)  and  the  ATV  industry’s  trade 
association,  the  Specialty  Vehicle  Institute  of  America  (SVIA),  have  long-standing 
policies  stating  that  it  is  inappropriate  for  children  under  16  years  old  to  operate 
or  otherwise  ride  adult-size  ATVs.  CFA’s  petition  and  subsequent  policy  rec-
ommendations  sought  to  give  CPSC  the  necessary  tools  to  enforce  this  guideline 
since no Federal mandatory ATV safety laws currently exist. 

The Commission and experts in child health have concluded that children should 
not ride adult-size ATVs because ATVs are inherently difficult to operate for adults 
and beyond the development capability of children to control. However, the Commis-
sion’s  proposed  rule  and  the  draft  voluntary  standards  fail  to  consider  this  com-
plexity. 

While there seems to be almost universal agreement among experts that children 
should  not  operate  or  ride  adult-size  ATVs,  no  mechanisms  are  in  place  to  ensure 
that  this  does  not  happen.  Unfortunately,  we  know  that  children  do  ride  adult  size 
ATVs  and  that  that  too  many  children  are  getting  killed  and  injured  when  they 
drive vehicles that are too large, too fast, and too powerful for them. 
B. Federal Role in Improving ATV Safety 

Federal regulation barring the sale of certain ATVs for children could significantly 
change legal and other dynamics facing the ATV industry, and dealers in particular. 
When  the  consent  decrees  were  in  effect,  CPSC  reported  that  compliance  was  con-
sistently high. Compliance dropped dramatically when replaced with a voluntary ap-
proach.  When  the  legal  hammer  was  removed,  dealers  appear  to  have  concluded 
that  the  risks  of  violating  the  voluntary  standard  are  outweighed  by  the  benefits 
associated  with  selling  adult-size  ATVs  in  violation  of  those  standards.  Ongoing 
monitoring by manufacturers failed to encourage widespread and consistent compli-
ance.  With  a  Federal  regulation  in  place  and  stepped  up  enforcement  by  CPSC,  we 
believe  the  legal  dynamics  would  be  very  similar  to  those  that  existed  under  the 
consent decrees. If dealer compliance rises, then sales of adult-size ATVs for use by 
children would decline. Reduction in such sales would indirectly affect use, because 
a smaller number of adult-size ATVs would be available to this age group. 
VII. Legislative Background 

At the June 2006 hearing, Senator Pryor asked the parties who were testifying— 
including among others, the American Academy of Pediatrics (AAP), Consumer Fed-
eration  of  America  (CFA)  and  representatives  of  the  ATV  industry—to  work  to-
gether  to  develop  mutually  supported  legislation.  During  the  following  September, 
CFA  and  a  lawyer  for  an  ATV  manufacturer  provided  comments  to  each  other  and 
to  Senate  staff  on  an  ATV  bill  being  drafted  by  then-Senator  Allen.  Those  commu-
nications were narrowly tailored to discussions about the draft bill and did not lead 
to the introduction of a broadly supported ATV safety bill. 

On  March  1,  2007,  CFA  and  AAP  were  invited  to  meet  with  Senate  Commerce 
Committee  staff  to  discuss  the  Senate  staff’s  desire  for  CFA  and  AAP  to  meet  with 
representatives of the all-terrain vehicle (ATV) industry to find a consensus on ATV 
safety legislation. CFA and AAP agreed to meet with ATV manufacturer representa-
tives. 

Our first meeting took place on March 14, 2007. At this meeting all parties openly 
presented  their  perspectives  on  the  current  draft  legislation  as  well  as  on  broader 
ATV  policy  issues.  The  first  meeting  was  candid,  productive  and  set  the  stage  for 
a positive working relationship. We met again on March 26, 2007. 
VIII. CFA’s Position on ATV Import Legislation 

At  these  meetings,  CFA  expressed  its  view  on  the  draft  legislation  which  would 
require  all  ATVs  sold  in  the  United  States  to  meet  voluntary  safety  standards  and 
to have an ATV Action Plan on file with the Consumer Product Safety Commission. 
Since all of the major domestic manufacturers already have such Action Plans, this 
bill  is  aimed  at  creating  a  level  playing  field  with  imported  ATVs  that  are  coming 
in from China and other nations. While it is clear that the large ATV manufacturers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

fear  the  rising  percentage  of  less  expensive,  imported  ATVs  as  an  economic  threat, 
there  has  been  little  evidence  put  forth  indicating  what  percentage  of  ATV  deaths 
and injuries are caused by these imported ATVs. CFA would like to thwart a safety 
threat  before  it  becomes  apparent  but  prioritizes  working  to  solve  the  documented 
hazards of children riding adult-size ATVs. 

In 2006, CFA reviewed ATV recalls undertaken by CPSC. We found that: 
• For  ATV  recalls  listing  the  country  of  manufacture,  20  were  manufactured  in 
the  United  States;  3  were  manufactured  in  Canada;  3  were  manufactured  in 
Japan; 1 was manufactured in Taiwan; and 1 was manufactured in China. 

• 91.7 percent of ATVs recalled involved units manufactured by major ATV man-
ufacturers  who  are  members  of  the  Specialty  Vehicle  Institute  of  America 
(SVIA).6 

• In  2005  alone,  94  percent  (16  out  of  17)  of  ATVs  recalled  were  manufactured 

by major ATV manufacturers. 

Thus,  CFA  is  concerned  that  efforts  to  deal  solely  with  imported  ATVs  will  have 
a  marginal  benefit  to  the  health  and  safety  of  Americans  riding  ATVs.  The  focus 
of  ATV  safety  legislation  must  be  on  all  ATVs,  not  merely  those  imported  into  the 
United  States,  no  matter  how  quickly  that  sector  may  be  growing.  CFA  is  alarmed 
that the draft legislation does not seek to solve any of the existing ATV safety prob-
lems  caused  by  the  major  ATV  manufacturers.  Thus,  while  seeking  to  prevent  the 
sale of unsafe imported ATVs is a goal with which both CFA and AAP could concur, 
it cannot be the sole focus of any legislative proposal that purports to address ‘‘ATV 
safety.’’ 
A. Weakness of SVIA/ANSI Voluntary Standard 

CFA  also  has  deep  reservations  about  legislation  that  would  require  all  ATVs  to 
meet  the  SVIA/ANSI  ATV  standard.  Especially  with  its  proposed  revisions,  the 
standards  are  far  too  weak  to  curb  ATV  deaths  and  injuries.  While  the  latest  draft 
language  of  the  bill  makes  compliance  with  the  existing  standard  mandatory,  the 
legislation allows for CPSC to make future versions of the standard the substantive 
requirements  underlying  the  legislation.  CFA  has  opposed  these  revisions  and  has 
provided extensive comments to the SVIA/ANSI ATV Standard Developer. 

Our opposition is premised on the fact that these standards are changing the way 
ATVs  have  been  traditionally  categorized,  shifting  away  from  engine  size  to  a  sys-
tem based upon speed. The SVIA/ANSI draft standard proposes to alter the age/size 
guidelines  by  creating  a  system  that  limits  the  maximum  speeds  of  ATVs  intended 
for  use  by  children  under  the  age  of  16.  The  draft  standard  proposes  a  Category  T 
(Transition  Model)  ATV,  intended  for  children  14  or  older  with  adult  supervision, 
or  by  an  operator  16  or  older,  with  a  maximum  speed  of  38  mph;  Category  Y–12 
+  ATVs,  intended  for  children  12  or  older,  with  a  maximum  speed  of  30  mph;  Cat-
egory  Y–10  +  ATV,  intended  for  use  by  children  age  10  or  older,  with  a  maximum 
speed  of  30  mph;  and  Category  Y6  +  ATVs,  intended  for  children  age  6  years  old, 
with a maximum speed of 15 mph. 

No  evidence  supports  the  development  of  the  above-described  categories.  No  data 
exists to demonstrate whether children could safely operate ATVs at the speed lim-
its  suggested.  Further,  the  explanations  for  the  speed  limits  are  based  upon  con-
sumer preference, not medical expertise or safety. In addition, the speed limits will 
be  maintained  by  speed-limiting  devices  that  we  understand  have  a  history  of  fail-
ure. Finally, we are concerned that the draft standard’s new categorization does not 
consider the implications of the weight of an ATV—a key factor in many devastating 
injuries when ATVs topple or roll over. 
B. Weakness of ATV Action Plans 

The draft legislation also proposes to require that the manufacturers or importers 
of  all  ATVs  that  are  sold  in  the  United  States  file  ‘‘ATV  Action  Plans’’  with  the 
CPSC.  These  Action  Plans  are  a  continuation  of  the  substantive  provisions  of  a 
court-approved  consent  decree  between  ATV  manufacturers  and  the  CPSC,  which 
forced  the  industry  to  end  production  of  highly  dangerous  three-wheel  ATVs,  and 
which  expired  in  1998.  Since  that  time,  major  ATV  manufacturers  have  been  oper-
ating  under  voluntary  ‘‘Action  Plans.’’  These  Action  Plans  rely  on  fine  print  in  ads, 
warning  labels,  and  recommendations  enforced  at  the  discretion  of  manufacturers. 
This  voluntary  approach,  however,  is  failing  to  curb  the  rising  tide  of  ATV  deaths 
and  injuries.  Further,  the  CPSC  has  not  provided  compliance  or  enforcement  infor-

6 Polaris joined SVIA in September of 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

mation  of  these  ‘‘Action  Plans’’  to  the  public,  thus  not  allowing  for  the  opportunity 
to evaluate the effectiveness of, or even compliance with, these agreements. 
IX. Results of Meetings between AAP, CFA and ATV Manufacturers 

During  the  meetings  among  representatives  of  CFA,  AAP,  and  ATV  manufactur-
ers, the parties not only expressed concern or support with the draft legislation, but 
CFA  and  AAP  also  provided  a  list  of  policies  that  should  be  included  in  any  mean-
ingful  ATV  safety  legislation.  This  list  of  policies  provided  the  framework  for  these 
meetings. The AAP’s list of recommendations includes: 

1. Children under 16 should not operate ATVs. 
• A driver’s license should be required to operate an ATV. 
2.  Alcohol  use  by  operators  of  ATVs  should  be  prohibited,  with  zero  tolerance 

among 16- to 20-year-old operators. 

• Zero tolerance policies for underage ATV operators. 
3. ATV use should be banned on paved roads. 
• Use of ATVs should be allowed only on designated, well-maintained trails. 
4. Appropriate protective gear should be required to operate an ATV. 
• ATV operators should be required to wear a helmet. 
5. Carrying passengers on an ATV should be prohibited. 
6. ATVs should not be operated before sunrise or after sunset. 
7. Manufacturers should redesign ATVs to improve safety. 
8. National ban on children under 16 operating ATVs on Federal lands. 
9. Other restrictions related to children under 16 operating ATVs on Federal lands. 
In addition to AAP’s recommendations for ATV safety, AAP made clear that their 

policies firmly oppose children under 16 riding any size ATV. 

CFA also provided all parties with recommendations to be included in a legislative 
proposal.  Included  in  the  list  below  are  CFA’s  recommendations  and  reasoning  for 
the provision as well as the industry’s response: 

1.  Make  the  ban  on  the  sale  of  adult  size  ATVs  for  use  for  children  mandatory. 
Give  manufacturers  the  tools  to  hold  dealers  accountable  for  known  sales  of  adult- 
size  ATVs  for  children.  CFA’s  official  position  is  that  children  under  16  should  not 
ride adult-sized ATVs. This position is shared by CPSC and industry. This is an ef-
fort to codify industry’s golden rules and to give tools to manufacturers to hold deal-
ers responsible when they knowingly sell adult-size ATVs to children. 

The ATV manufacturers philosophically agreed that no child under age 16 should 
operate  an  adult  machine.  However,  they  would  not  agree  to  a  ban  on  sale  due  to 
concerns  regarding  enforcement,  potential  liability  for  dealers  who  acted  in  good 
faith, and lack of control over parents’ choices regarding their children’s riding hab-
its. 

2. Institute guidelines for Federal lands that: 

a. Prohibit children from riding adult size ATVs 
b. Require the use of helmets 
c. Ban passengers 
d. Ban riding on paved roads 
e. Ban riding at night 

These provisions essentially mirror SVIA’s model law—including provisions to re-
quire helmets, and ban passengers, riding on paved roads, riding at night, and chil-
dren on adult ATVs. These behaviors are all already included on warning labels on 
ATVs. Federal lands offer a unique opportunity for the Federal Government to insti-
tute best practices. 

The ATV manufacturers were amenable to drafting language on all provisions ex-
cept  passengers,  where  they  wished  to  allow  passengers  on  two-up  ATVs.  They 
agreed to explore requiring CPSC to partner with USDA (USFS) and Interior (NPS, 
FWS, etc.) to develop regulations. 

3.  Create  a  incentive  system  in  Federal  law  for  states  to  pass  strong  ATV  safety 
laws  that  ban  children  from  riding  adult  size  ATVs,  ban  passengers,  ban  use  on 
paved  roads  and  at  night,  and  require  helmets  and  safety  gear.  CFA  noted  that  in-
centives could be a ‘‘carrot’’ (increased funds if laws are passed) or a ‘‘stick’’ (reduced 
funds if they are not). 

ATV  manufacturers  are  amenable  to  exploring  potential  incentives  for  states  to 

pass restrictions along the lines of the SVIA model law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

4.  Ban  the  sale  of  three  wheel  ATVs.  Issue  a  recall  for  all  those  which  remain  in 
use. Three wheelers are still causing 10 percent of ATV injuries and have been docu-
mented to be even more unstable and unsafe than 4-wheelers. 

ATV manufacturers agreed to ban sale of three-wheeled ATVs. Domestic manufac-
turers  have  not  produced  them  for  many  years.  However,  ATV  manufacturers  re-
fused to agree to a recall. The industry position is still that three-wheeled ATVs are 
not inherently unsafe. 

5. Codify 90ccs as the threshold for adult size ATVs. CFA is particularly concerned 
that  the  voluntary  standard  and  CPSC  rulemaking  are  moving  away  from  engine 
size  as  the  classification  basis  for  youth  versus  adult-size  ATVs.  CFA  is  concerned 
that this new categorization will lead to more children on larger, faster ATVs. CFA 
views  this  as  critical  to  safety  and  views  transitional  ATVs  as  a  cause  of  potential 
increases  in  deaths  and  injuries.  CFA  also  argues  that  there  is  no  basis  in  safety 
for speed limits of transitional and youth models. 

On this issue, there is a fundamental disagreement between the parties. Industry 
believes a set of criteria (engine size, fit, top speed, etc.) is a better yardstick. Indus-
try is responding to their view of what the market wants: kids are riding adult size 
ATVs  because  they  seek  more  speed  and  power.  The  transitional  ATVs  are  a  re-
sponse to this consumer demand. 

6.  Require  improvements  in  ATV  marketing,  particularly  on  the  presentation  of 

safety information: 

a. set size limits for the font of safety information 
b. set guidelines for placement on pages 
c. limit marketing to children based on speed and power 

Current  marketing  and  advertising  hides  safety  information  in  small  font  and  in 
hard-to-access locations in advertisements. Safety information must be readable and 
more prominent. Riders should not be shown undertaking unsafe behaviors; children 
should not be marketed to using prohibited conduct, speed or power. 

ATV  manufacturers  expressed  a  willingness  to  discuss  options,  but  wished  to  be 
sure  that  any  changes  would  apply  to  all  manufacturers,  not  a  subset.  They  ex-
pressed  their  willingness  to  discuss  giving  CPSC  the  authority  to  set  standards  on 
ATV marketing to children. 

7.  Establish  minimum  stability  requirements  for  ATVs.  Require  addition  of  a  lat-
eral  stability  test  and  improvements  to  the  pitch  stability  equation  by  requiring  a 
higher  pitch  stability  coefficient.  The  current  pitch  stability  computation  should  be 
abandoned.  Stability  issues,  such  as  those  involved  in  causing  rollovers,  contribute 
to 45 percent of injuries, according to a CPSC examination of incidents from CPSC’s 
2001  injury  study.  Yet  the  voluntary  standard  does  not  include  a  lateral  stability 
test.  CPSC  has  not  been  able  to  conduct  research  due  to  limited  funds.  This  is  an 
issue of critical importance that has been overlooked. 

The  ATV  manufacturers  are  opposed  to  this  proposal.  They  argue  that  the  issue 

is too variable to set useful requirements or standards. 

8.  Issue  a  standard  to  reduce  suspension  failures.  Suspension  failures  are  a  basis 
for a large number of ATV recalls by numerous manufacturers in recent years. Even 
if  quality  assurance  is  a  problem,  as  CPSC  and  manufacturers  claim,  this  should 
be prevented by better standard. 

ATV  manufacturers  oppose  this  proposal.  They  argue  that  such  failures  are  usu-
ally  due  to  quality  assurance  issues  (e.g.,  failure  of  materials)  not  design  problems. 
9.  Improve  standards  for  ATV  training  and  requirements  to  make  training  free 
and  geographically  available.  According  to  a  CPSC  study,  less  than  4  percent  of 
ATV purchasers take ATV training courses. Some anecdotal evidence suggests ATV 
trainings are not substantive and are located too far away from most buyers for re-
alistic use. 

ATV manufacturers expressed a willingness to discuss options, but were not sure 
of  possibilities.  They  discussed  current  cash  rebates  and  data  on  why  training  does 
not  occur,  including  a  high  ‘‘no-show’’  rate.  A  number  of  states  require  children  to 
have  certification.  ATV  manufacturers  also  discussed  adding  this  to  model  stand-
ards under proposals for standards in Federal lands. 

10.  Require  sale  of  helmet  with  ATV.  Helmet  usage  could  likely  reduce  severity 

of injuries associated with head trauma. 

ATV  manufacturers  stated  that  any  helmet  proposal  must  be  restricted  to  chil-
dren.  They  discussed  the  possibility  of  covering  helmet  usage  under  proposals  for 
standards on public lands. 

11. Require CPSC to conduct a study evaluating a child’s ability to operate vehicle 
up to 38 mph and conduct an analysis of the safety implications of operating an ATV 
at  30  and  38  mph.  This  proposal  is  aimed  at  providing  data  to  counter  the  trend 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

toward faster machines for youth. Both ATV industry and CPSC have set speed lim-
itations for youth and transitional models without evidence justifying operability by 
a child or safety consequences. 

ATV  manufacturers  were  amenable  to  having  a  study,  but  would  like  CPSC  to 
have  broad  authority  to  develop  and  tailor  parameters.  They  do  not  wish  to  specify 
ages, speeds, etc. in legislation. 

12. Request GAO studies analyzing CPSC compliance efforts on the ATV Voluntary 
Action  Plans;  actual  costs  to  society  of  ATV  deaths  and  injuries;  and  an  analysis  of 
enforcement  mechanisms  to  ensure  compliance  with  existing  state  laws  and  the  po-
tential for enforcement of a Federal law. CPSC has not made their compliance efforts 
publicly  available,  but  inclusion  in  a  Commissioner’s  statement  implies  compliance 
rates  have  dropped.  CFA  wrote  a  letter  to  CPSC’s  General  Counsel  requesting  this 
data  but  has  not  received  any  information.  This  information  is  important  to  docu-
ment realities of market compliance with voluntary system and effectiveness of cur-
rent system. No broad-based studies document the cost to society of ATV deaths and 
injuries. 

ATV  manufacturers  were  open  to  a  GAO  study.  They  would  like  the  study  to  in-

clude benefits of ATV usage (e.g., economic benefits) as well. 

13.  Increase  funding  for  CPSC’s  ATV  safety  efforts—specifically  for  enforcement 
and  monitoring  of  dealer  compliance.  Given  CPSC’s  limited  resources,  the  Agency 
needs additional funds to work on ATV compliance and regulatory efforts. 

Industry representatives agreed. 
14.  Establish  mandatory  standards  for  speed-limiting  devices,  including  making 
them  impervious  to  tampering  or  adjustment  by  consumers.  Current  CPSC  and  in-
dustry  proposals  for  youth  and  transitional  vehicles  depend  upon  use  of  speed-lim-
iting  devices  that  have  a  high  failure  rate  and  can  be  tampered  with  easily  by 
youth. The industry has no standard for these devices. 

ATV  manufacturers  would  likely  oppose  this  proposal.  Industry  representatives 
debated  whether  to  provide  for  dealerships  to  be  the  sole  entity  with  the  ability  to 
adjust  speed  Governors  and  decided  that  parents  should  have  that  control.  The 
ANSI standard has performance specification for Governors that suffices. 

15.  Require  improvements  to  service  brake  performance.  Brake  problems  were  the 
basis  of  a  large  number  of  ATV  recalls  in  recent  years.  The  consequences  of  brake 
failure  include  death  or  serious  injury.  Such  consistent  failures,  even  if  caused  by 
quality assurance problems, could be prevented by a standard. 

ATV  manufacturers  oppose  this  proposal.  They  argue  that  such  failures  are  usu-
ally  due  to  quality  assurance  issues  (e.g.,  failure  of  materials)  not  design  problems. 
16.  Require  seatbelts.  Seatbelts  would  decrease  severity  of  injury  in  crashes  and 

rollovers. 

rollovers. 

ATV  manufacturers  oppose  this  proposal.  Industry  data  shows  seatbelts  would 

cause more injuries in some circumstances. 

17.  Require  roll-cages.  Roll  bars  would  decrease  severity  of  injury  in  crashes  and 

ATV  manufacturers  oppose  this  proposal.  Industry  data  shows  roll  bars  would 

cause more injuries in some circumstances. 

18.  Require  headlights  or  running  lights  on  all  ATVs  to  improve  visibility.  There 
was  discussion  of  whether  lights  could  be  bright  enough  to  improve  visibility  with-
out encouraging night riding. 

ATV  manufacturers  were  not  certain  of  their  support  for  this  proposal.  Current 
standards  prohibit  headlamps  on  youth  ATVs  to  discourage  nighttime  riding.  The 
proposed  revised  SVIA/ANSI  standard  would  permit  (not  require)  headlamps  on 
youth models. 

19.  The  following  language  should  appear  on  warning  labels  for  all  ATVs,  ‘‘Even 
with  ATV  experience,  youths  have  immature  judgment  and  should  never  drive  an 
ATV  that  is  too  large  or  too  fast  for  them  to  operate.  Children  die  and  are  seriously 
injured  when  they  operate  ATVs  that  are  too  large  and  too  powerful  for  them.’’  This 
language best reflects reality of consequence of children riding adult size ATVs and 
would provide more effective warning to parents of consequences of children’s oper-
ation of adult-size ATVs. 

ATV manufacturers oppose this proposal. This language reportedly proposed test-
ed poorly among parents, some of whom found it ‘‘offensive’’ since it referred to im-
mature  judgment  among  youth.  They  also  stated  that  language  was  too  broad.  The 
differences with CPSC-mandated language could be problematic. 

Thus, on our priority issue of banning the sale of adult size ATVs for use for chil-
dren,  we  do  not  have  agreement.  We  do  have  some  basic  philosophical  agreement 
on  the  following  issues:  safety  standards  for  Federal  lands;  incentives  for  states  to 
pass  strong  ATV  safety  legislation;  possible  agreement  on  selling  helmets  with 
youth  model  ATVs;  improvements  to  marketing  and  training;  requiring  CPSC  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

conduct a study of a child’s ability to operate an ATV at various speeds; requesting 
a  GAO  study  on  CPSC’s  compliance  efforts  and  increasing  funding  for  CPSC’s  ATV 
safety activities. 
X. Role for States in Conjunction with Federal Role 

We  recognize  that  CPSC  does  not  have  the  authority  to  take  every  action  nec-
essary  to  solve  the  full  scope  of  the  problems  currently  caused  by  ATVs.  While 
CPSC  can  ban  the  sale  of  adult-size  ATVs  for  use  by  children  under  16,  we  urge 
CPSC  and  industry  to  support  state  efforts  to  set  licensing  and  rider  training  re-
quirements,  prohibit  riders  from  carrying  passengers,  and  require  ATV  riders  to 
wear  helmets  and  other  protective  equipment.  We  also  believe  that,  with  the  Fed-
eral and state governments taking strong action and providing more information to 
consumers, parental responsibility will increase as well. 
XI. Conclusion 

Each  and  every  year,  more  people,  especially  children,  are  killed  or  injured  as 
they ride ATVs. The current voluntary approach to safety has allowed these deaths 
and  injuries  not  only  to  continue  but  to  increase.  Every  year,  hundreds  of  families 
have  to  deal  with  the  loss  of  a  loved  one,  face  caring  for  a  severely  injured  family 
member, and incur the vast costs of medical care caused by the use of a recreational 
product: the all-terrain vehicle. We urge this Subcommittee to take strong action to 
curb the well documented hazards of all-terrain vehicles. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr.  David  Murray,  partner,  Wilkie,  Farr  &  Gallagher,  outside 

counsel to Yamaha Motor Corporation. 

Now,  let  me  say  this,  before  you  get  started,  I  told  you  we  were 
kind  of  busy  around  here?  They  just  called  a  vote,  and  I  have  to 
leave  in,  say,  10  minutes.  So,  right  after  you  finish  you—5  or  10 
minutes—as  soon  as  you  finish  your  opening  statement,  I’ll  run 
and  vote,  and  then  I’ll,  we’ll  come  back  and  reconvene.  Go  ahead. 

STATEMENT OF DAVID P. MURRAY, COUNSEL, 

YAMAHA MOTOR CORPORATION, U.S.A., 
WILLKIE FARR AND GALLAGHER, LLP 

Mr. MURRAY. Thank you. 
Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Subcommittee. 
My name is David Murray, I’m a member of Willkie Farr & Galla-
gher,  outside  counsel  to  Yamaha.  I’ve  been  involved  in  ATV  mat-
ters for over 20 years, including the 1987 settlement of the Federal 
Government  lawsuit  that  resulted  in  10-year  consent  decrees  end-
ing  the  sale  of  new  three-wheel  ATVs,  and  governing  the  mar-
keting and sale of four-wheel ATVs. 

My  wife  and  I  have  three  boys,  ages  9  to  14,  I’m  very  pleased 
to  have  them  here  today,  we  ride  ATVs  together,  as  a  family,  and 
they’re quite interested in this hearing. 

I’m  appearing  on  behalf  of  the  major  ATV  companies,  including 
Arctic  Cat,  BRP,  Honda,  Kawasaki,  Polaris,  Suzuki  and  Yamaha. 
I  want  to  thank  the  Subcommittee  for  its  ongoing  interest  in  ATV 
safety,  and  for  bringing  the  Consumer  Federation  of  America,  the 
American  Academy  of  Pediatrics,  and  the  companies  together  to 
discuss  this  important  issue.  To  my  knowledge,  it’s  the  first  time 
that representatives of the three groups have sat down at the same 
table. 

We  found  many  areas  of  common  ground,  and  while  we  have 
agreed  to  disagree  on  some  topics,  all  of  the  discussions  were  in 
good faith, and very constructive. 

Millions  of  Americans,  including  my  family,  safely  operate  and 
enjoy  ATVs  for  a  wide  range  of  recreational  and  utility  purposes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

There are more than 7.65 million ATVs in use around the country, 
and the number is growing. In 2006 alone, new vehicle sales topped 
1.15 million units. 

The  draft  ATV  safety  bill  that  the  parties  have  been  discussing 
with  Subcommittee  staff  is  urgently  needed  to  address  funda-
mental  changes  in  the  industry,  and  to  protect  American  con-
sumers. 

Last  June,  the  Subcommittee  held  an  initial  hearing  on  compli-
ance  with  ATV  standards.  A  representative  of  the  U.S.  Consumer 
Product  Safety  Commission  testified  that,  while  the  major  ATV 
companies  comply  with  these  standards,  a  significant  number  of 
new  entrants—primarily  from  China  and  Taiwan—are  selling 
ATVs  that  do  not.  The  majority  of  these  non-complying  units  are 
targeted  to  American  children,  and  they’re  being  sold  over  the 
Internet,  and  delivered  directly  to  homes,  or  in  big-box  retail 
stores, and other non-traditional retail outlets. 

The  Industry’s  trade  association,  the  Specialty  Vehicle  Institute 
of  America,  also  submitted  an  engineering  study  of  new-entrant 
ATVs,  conducted  by  two  former  CPSC  officials.  The  engineers  ex-
amined four ATVs that were manufactured in China, and marketed 
for use by children under 16. All four Chinese ATVs failed to com-
ply  with  critical  provisions  of  the  industry  standards,  and  three  of 
the  four  ATVs  had  such  serious  flaws,  that  the  engineers  rec-
ommended an immediate recall under the Consumer Product Safe-
ty  Act.  Just  last  week,  the  CPSC  announced  a  recall  of  one  of  the 
units for numerous safety violations. 

The Subcommittee also heard testimony on the ATV action plans 
that the major companies negotiated with CPSC in 1998. These ac-
tion  plans—as  Senator  Pryor  pointed  out—continue  the  core  regu-
latory components of the Federal consent decrees. Under the plans, 
each  company  has  agreed,  one,  to  offer  free,  hands-on  training  to 
all new ATV purchasers and qualifying family members, plus cash, 
or other incentives, for taking the course. 

Two,  to  restrict  the  marketing  and  sale  of  ATVs  to  children 

under 16 to models of 90cc engine displacement, or less. 

Three, to conduct annual, undercover investigations of their deal-

ers for compliance with the youth ATV sales restrictions. 

And,  four,  to  sponsor  comprehensive  safety  information  pro-
grams,  including  at  the  point  of  purchase,  through  our  trade  asso-
ciation,  and  in  public  schools,  using  the  Weekly  Reader,  and  other 
media. 

American  companies,  such  as  Arctic  Cat,  and  John  Deere,  and  a 
Canadian  company,  BRP,  signed  on  to  the  same  ATV  action  plans 
when  they  subsequently  entered  the  U.S.  market.  But,  as  CPSC 
testified  last  year,  virtually  none  of  the  new-entrant  companies 
from  China  or  Taiwan  have  agreed  to  do  so,  despite  repeated  re-
quests by the agency. 

Many of these ATVs are being sold by new entrants, they’re poor-
ly manufactured, and they come with no offer of training, and little 
or  no  safety  information,  or  product  support.  We’ve  also  supplied 
the  Subcommittee,  CFA,  and  the  Academy  with  recent  advertise-
ments  from  some  of  these  companies,  promoting  ATVs  as  large  as 
250cc  with  top  speeds  of  65  miles  per  hour,  for  children  as  young 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

as 12, and ATVs as large as 110cc with top speeds of 45 miles per 
hour, for children as young as 7. 

Over  the  past  5  years,  we’ve  given  CPSC  copies  of  similar  ads, 
engineering  studies,  and  other  information  about  new-entrant 
ATVs. But, as CPSC testified last June, because the current indus-
try  standards  and  action  plans  are  voluntary,  it  is  difficult  and 
time-consuming  for  the  agency  to  take  enforcement  action  against 
new entrants under the CPSA. Indeed, it took CPSC nearly a year 
to  recall  only  one  of  the  four  Chinese  ATVs  examined  by  this  sub-
committee last June. 

During  the  same  5  years,  new-entrant  ATV  sales  in  the  U.S. 
have grown dramatically, from a few percent of the market in 2002, 
to  nearly  35  percent  of  the  market,  in  2006.  Power  Products  Mar-
keting, a Minneapolis-based research and business consulting firm, 
has tracked new entrant sales since 2000. The firm issued a report, 
just this week, showing that new-entrant ATV sales doubled in the 
last  year,  growing  from  approximately  260,000  units  in  2005,  to 
nearly 400,000 units in 2006, or one-third of the market. Estimated 
2007 sales will likely top one-half million units. 

Since  our  hearing  last  June,  new  entrants  have  continued  to 
flood  the  U.S.  market  with  hundreds  of  thousands  of  substandard 
ATVs.  Despite  good  intentions,  the  CPSC  has  been  unable  to  take 
any  enforcement  action  against  most  of  these  companies.  These 
substandard  ATVs  pose  unnecessary  risks  to  U.S.  consumers,  and 
undermine the longstanding safety efforts of CPSC, consumer advo-
cates and the major companies. 

Appropriate  Federal  legislation  is  urgently  needed  to  address 
this  situation.  The  draft  legislation  we’ve  discussed  would  require 
all ATV companies—whether domestic or foreign—to adhere to the 
same  basic  industry  standards,  and  to  provide  adequate  training, 
safety  information,  and  product  support  under  CPSC-approved  ac-
tion  plans.  It  would  also  preserve  the  agency’s  ability  to  adopt 
mandatory  standards  for  ATVs  under  its  existing  regulatory  au-
thority,  and  most  importantly,  it  would  give  CPSC  the  tools  to  en-
force  the  standards—including  the  ability  to  impose  fines  on  com-
panies that violate them—and the authority to work with Customs, 
to  keep  non-compliant  products  from  entering  the  stream  of  com-
merce. The Act is fair, balanced, and should be enacted as soon as 
possible. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Murray? 
Mr. MURRAY. Yes, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. I hate to cut you off there, but let me go run and 
vote,  we’ll  go  into  a  5  to  10-minute  recess  here,  but  I  just  need  to 
get over there and vote before my time runs out. 

We’ll be back in about 5 or 10 minutes. 
Mr. MURRAY. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr. MURRAY. Thank you. 
[Recess] 
Senator  PRYOR.  Let’s  reconvene  and  I’m  sorry  I  had  to  cut  you 

off there Mr. Murray. Had you finished your statement? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Yes  I  had,  Senator,  other  than  to  just  thank  the 
Subcommittee again for its interest in this draft legislation, and its 
sponsorship of our meeting with CFA and the Academy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Murray follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID P. MURRAY, COUNSEL, YAMAHA MOTOR 

CORPORATION, U.S.A., WILLKIE FARR AND GALLAGHER, LLP 

Good  afternoon  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is 
David Murray. I am a member of Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP and outside counsel 
to Yamaha Motor Corporation, U.S.A. I have been involved in ATV matters for over 
20  years,  including  the  1987  settlement  of  the  Federal  Government’s  lawsuit  that 
resulted  in  10  year  consent  decrees  ending  the  sale  of  new  three-wheel  ATVs  and 
governing the marketing and sale of four-wheel ATVs. My wife and I also have three 
boys, ages 9 to 14, who are here today. We enjoy riding ATVs as a family. 

On  behalf  of  the  major  ATV  companies,1 I  want  to  thank  the  Subcommittee  for 
its ongoing interest in ATV safety. I also want to thank the Subcommittee for bring-
ing the Consumer Federation of America, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and 
the  Companies  together  to  discuss  this  important  issue.  To  my  knowledge,  it  is  the 
first time that representatives of the three groups have sat down at the same table. 
We  found  many  areas  of  common  ground.  And  while  we  ‘‘agreed  to  disagree’’  on 
some  topics,  all  of  the  discussions  were  in  good  faith  and  very  constructive.  Based 
on  these  efforts,  we  hope  to  continue  to  work  with  CFA,  the  Academy,  and  other 
interested  parties  to  increase  consumer  awareness  of  the  potential  risks  associated 
with ATV use, especially by children. 

The  draft  bill  that  the  parties  have  been  discussing  with  the  Subcommittee  staff 
would  be  a  critical  step  forward  in  promoting  ATV  safety.  Millions  of  Americans, 
including my family, safely operate and enjoy ATVs for a wide range of recreational 
and utility purposes. There are more than 7.6 million ATVs in use around the coun-
try,  and  the  number  is  growing.  In  2006  alone,  new  vehicle  sales  topped  1.15  mil-
lion. 

Last  June,  this  Subcommittee  held  an  initial  hearing  on  compliance  with  ATV 
safety standards. A representative of the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission 
testified  that,  while  the  major  ATV  Companies  comply  with  the  industry  safety 
standards,  a  significant  number  of  new  entrants—primarily  from  China  and  Tai-
wan—are  selling  ATVs  that  fail  these  standards.2 The  majority  of  these  non-com-
plying units are targeted to American children and are being sold over the Internet 
and  delivered  directly  to  homes,  or  in  ‘‘big  box’’  retail  stores  and  other  non-tradi-
tional  outlets.3 The  industry’s  trade  association,  the  Specialty  Vehicle  Institute  of 
America,  likewise  submitted  an  engineering  study  of  new  entrant  ATVs  conducted 
by  two  former  CPSC  officials  with  more  than  55  years’  combined  experience  at  the 
agency.  The  engineers  examined  four  ATVs  that  were  manufactured  in  China  and 
marketed for use by children under 16. All four Chinese ATVs failed to comply with 
critical  provisions  of  the  industry  standards.  And  three  of  the  four  ATVs  had  such 
serious  flaws  that  the  engineers  recommended  an  immediate  recall  under  the  Con-
sumer  Product  Safety  Act.4 Just  last  week,  the  CPSC  announced  a  recall  of  one  of 
these  units  for  inadequate  stop  engine  switches,  tire  pressure  gauges,  tire  labeling, 
and a failure to meet other basic safety requirements.5 

The  Subcommittee  also  heard  testimony  on  the  ATV  Action  Plans  that  the  major 
companies  negotiated  with  CPSC  in  1998.  These  Action  Plans  continue  the  major 
regulatory  components  of  the  Federal  consent  decrees.  Under  the  plans,  each  com-
pany has agreed: 

• to offer free hands-on training to all new ATV purchasers and qualifying 
• family members, plus cash or other incentives for taking the course; 
• to  restrict  the  marketing  and  sale  of  ATVs  to  children  under  16  to  models  of 
• to conduct annual undercover investigations of their dealers for compliance with 

90cc engine displacement or less; 

the youth ATV sales restrictions; and 

1 The major ATV Companies include American Honda Motor Co., Inc., American Suzuki Motor 
Corporation,  Arctic  Cat  Inc.,  Bombardier  Recreational  Products,  Inc.,  Kawasaki  Motors  Corp., 
U.S.A., Polaris Industries Inc., and Yamaha Motor Corporation, U.S.A. 

2 Annexed  as  Exhibit  1  are  relevant  excerpts  of  the  testimony  of  Elizabeth  Leland,  Project 
Manager, ATV Safety Review Team, U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission (June 6, 2006). 
3 See ‘‘Sales of Non-Traditional Brand ATVs Continue Rapid Growth in 2006,’’ by Power Prod-

ucts Marketing (May 2007) (annexed as Exhibit 2). 

4 A copy of the Marchica & Deppa Engineering Report is annexed as Exhibit 3. 
5 A copy of the May 3, 2007 Recall Alert issued by the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commis-

sion is annexed as Exhibit 4. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

• to  sponsor  comprehensive  safety 

information  programs,  both  at  point- 
ofpurchase, through SVIA, and in public schools through the Weekly Reader or-
ganization and other media.6 

American  companies,  such  as  Arctic  Cat  and  John  Deere,  and  a  Canadian  com-
pany,  BRP,  signed  on  to  the  same  ATV  Action  Plans  when  they  subsequently  en-
tered  the  U.S.  market.  But  as  CPSC  testified  last  year,  virtually  none  of  the  new 
entrant companies from China or Taiwan have agreed to do so, despite repeated re-
quests  from  the  agency.7 Many  of  the  ATVs  being  sold  by  these  new  entrants  are 
not  only  poorly  manufactured,  but  they  come  with  no  offer  of  training  and  little  or 
no safety information or product support. We have also supplied the Subcommittee, 
CFA, and the Academy with recent advertisements from these new entrants, which 
are promoting: 

• ATVs  as  large  as  250cc,  with  top  speeds  of  65  mph,  for  children  as  young  as 

• ATVs  as  large  as  110cc,  with  top  speeds  of  45  mph,  for  children  as  young  as 

12; and 

7.8 

Over  the  past  5  years,  we  have  given  CPSC  copies  of  similar  ads,  engineering 
studies,  and  other  information  about  new  entrant  ATVs.  As  CPSC  testified  last 
June, because the current industry safety standards and Action Plans are voluntary, 
it is difficult and time-consuming for the agency to take enforcement action against 
new  entrants  under  the  CPSA.9 Indeed,  it  took  CPSC  nearly  a  year  to  recall  only 
one of the four new entrant ATV models examined at the June hearing, despite the 
engineering study and evidence of defects provided by SVIA. 

During the same 5 years, new entrant ATV sales in the U.S. have grown dramati-
cally,  from  a  few  percent  of  the  market  in  2002  to  nearly  35  percent  of  the  market 
in  2006.  In  fact,  it  turns  out  that  the  sales  chart  that  SVIA  provided  to  the  Sub-
committee  last  June  seriously  underestimated  new  entrant  ATV  sales  for  2006. 
Power  Products  Marketing,  a  Minneapolis-based  research  and  business  consulting 
firm,  has  tracked  new  entrant  sales  for  nearly  10  years.  The  firm  issued  a  report 
this  week  showing  that  new  entrant  ATV  sales  doubled  in  the  last  year,  growing 
from  approximately  260,000  units  in  2005  to  nearly  400,000  units  in  2006—or  one- 
third of the market. Estimated 2007 sales will likely top one-half million units. The 
following sales chart depicts this rapid growth: 10 

6 A copy of Yamaha’s approved ATV Action Plan is annexed as Exhibit 5. It is representative 
of the Action Plans that other major ATV Companies negotiated with the U.S. Consumer Prod-
uct Safety Commission. 

7 See testimony of Ms. Elizabeth Leland (annexed as Exhibit 1). 
8 Representative examples of new entrant ATV advertising targeting children under 16 are an-

nexed as Exhibit 6. 

9 See testimony of Ms. Elizabeth Leland (annexed as Exhibit 1). 
10 The chart is based on the market sales report annexed as Exhibit 2. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

In other words, since the last time we met, new entrants have continued to flood 
the U.S. market with hundreds of thousands of substandard ATVs. Despite good in-
tentions,  the  CPSC  has  been  unable  to  take  any  significant  enforcement  action 
against  this  rising  tide.  These  substandard  ATVs  pose  unnecessary  risks  to  U.S. 
consumers and undermine the longstanding safety efforts of CPSC, consumer advo-
cates, and the major companies. The major ATV Companies believe that appropriate 
legislation is urgently needed to address this situation. 

The draft ‘‘All-Terrain Vehicles Standards and Compliance Act’’ would require all 
ATV  companies,  whether  domestic  or  foreign,  to  adhere  to  the  same  basic  industry 
standards and to provide adequate training, safety information, and product support 
under CPSC-approved Action Plans. The Act would also preserve the CPSC’s ability 
to  adopt  other  mandatory  safety  standards  for  ATVs  pursuant  to  its  existing  regu-
latory  authority.  Most  importantly,  the  Act  would  give  CPSC  the  tools  to  enforce 
these  standards,  including  (1)  the  ability  to  impose  fines  on  companies  that  violate 
them  and  (2)  the  authority  to  work  with  Customs  to  keep  non-compliant  products 
from entering the stream of commerce. The Act is fair, balanced, and should be en-
acted as soon as possible. 

The  major  ATV  companies  have  also  supported  revisions  to  the  draft  legislation, 
in  response  to  issues  raised  by  CFA  and  the  Academy.  Some  of  these  are  reflected 
in  the  current  draft  and  others  are  outlined  in  the  position  statements  filed  with 
the  Subcommittee.11 In  other  cases,  we  agree  with  the  goals  of  CFA  and  the  Acad-
emy, but we are concerned that their legislative suggestions may fall outside of this 
Subcommittee’s  jurisdiction,  be  infeasible  or  unworkable,  or  delay  enactment  of  the 
bill,  which  is  so  urgently  needed.  Finally,  even  where  we  have  ‘‘agreed  to  disagree’’ 
on some legislative suggestions, the major ATV companies have benefited from this 
process  and  look  forward  to  continuing  to  work  with  CFA,  the  Academy,  and  other 
interested parties on areas of common ground. 

11 Copies of the written submissions are annexed as Exhibit 7. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
r
r
u
m
9
0
5

17 

On behalf of the companies, I want to thank the Subcommittee again for its inter-
est  in  this  draft  legislation  and  its  sponsorship  of  our  meetings  with  CFA  and  the 
Academy. I look forward to your questions. 

(The exhibits referred to are maintained in the Committee files.) 

Senator PRYOR. Well, thank you. And like I said, I appreciate you 
all  meeting  together,  and  we  have  a  great  staff  here  and  we’re  all 
eager to work with you to see if we can come up with some resolu-
tion here that’s a win/win for everybody. 

I would like to visit with both of you here for just a minute about 
your meetings. I guess, Ms. Weintraub, you said that the meetings 
were  candid  and  productive,  which  is  great,  but  is  there,  is  there 
still room for common ground or are we at irreconcilable differences 
on the rest of the topics that you all discussed? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Well,  I  think  there  definitely  is  room  for  more 
discussion.  We  came  to  agreement—at  least  general  philosophical 
agreement—about a number of issues. So I think, our thinking was 
that  we  would  provide  all  the  information  to  the  staff  and  then 
leave it up to staff to tell us what the next steps were. 

But  as  I  listed  before,  there  are  a  number  of  issues  that  we  did 
come to agreement. On some of the most important issues for CFA, 
we  did  not  come  to  agreement.  So,  I’m  not  in  a  position  yet  to  say 
where  we’d  be  on  something  even  if  it  were  to  take  all  of  those 
issues  because  there’s  still  room,  we  are  not  at  the  point  at  all 
where we have irreconcilable differences that we can’t pursue. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  Mr.  Murray,  what  about  your  thoughts  on 

irreconcilable differences or—— 

Mr. MURRAY. Well—— 
Senator PRYOR .—still room to discuss? 
Mr.  MURRAY.  No,  I’d  like  to  start  with  the  positive,  because  we 
have  supported  some  revisions  to  the  draft  legislation  that  reflect 
issues  raised  by  CFA  and  the  Academy  and  in  the  position  state-
ments  that  we’ve  submitted  to  the  Subcommittee,  we’ve  also  out-
lined some areas where we do have agreement. 

There  are  certainly  some  areas  where  we  agree  in  principle,  but 
we’re not sure that the proposals fall within the Subcommittee’s ju-
risdiction  or  would  be  feasible.  And,  bottom-line,  our  concern  is 
that this year alone there will be over a half million non-compliant 
ATVs  imported  into  the  U.S.  So,  we  feel  that  the  core  components 
of the bill need to be enacted urgently. 

And so we’re very willing to continue to work with CFA, and the 
Academy  and  other  interested  parties  on  areas  of  common  ground. 
We simply don’t want to slow down this bill and getting it enacted. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Let  me  ask  you,  if  I  may,  and  I’ll  direct 
these to you, Mr. Murray. I’m not trying to put you on the hot seat, 
but Ms. Weintraub in her opening statement listed out a few areas 
that  they  would  like  to  see  included  in  legislation.  The  first  one 
was children under 16 should be required to operate, should be re-
quired  to  have  a  driver’s  license  when  they  operate  an  ATV.  Does 
the company or the industry have a position on that? 

Mr. MURRAY. We support model State legislation that includes a 
training  requirement  and  a  training  certification  requirement.  A 
number of States have enacted that law, and require that children 
who operate on State lands be able to produce evidence of their cer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

tification. So, that’s an area where we are already actively working 
with the States to enact that type of legislation. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  under  that  model  act,  there,  they  get  some 

sort of certificate when they’ve completed the training course? 

Mr. MURRAY. That’s correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  so,  that’s  what  you  support.  Not  a  State- 

issued driver’s license, but a certificate. 

Mr.  MURRAY.  A  certificate  that  demonstrates  that  they’ve  taken 
an ATV safety training course. The course that we sponsor is about 
a 6-hour course. It includes both hands-on riding experience as well 
as  some  classroom-type  instruction.  It’s  done  often  around  a  picnic 
table,  because  you’re  out  in  areas  where  you  can  operate  the  vehi-
cles. 

Senator PRYOR. By the way, does either your company or the in-
dustry  have  an  age  limit  in  which  you  think  someone  of  that  age 
or younger should not be allowed to drive an ATV? Do you all have 
an age limit? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Yes,  our  voluntary  standard  specifies  that  the 
smallest units, the Y6 units, are for ages six and above and they’re 
speed  restricted.  They  come  from  the  factory  at  10  miles  per  hour 
and  can  be  adjusted  by  parents  with  the  specialized  tool  up  to  15, 
but no more than that. 

Senator PRYOR. And, if it’s not a Y6, do you have a minimum age 

there for, like a 90cc or anything? 

Mr. MURRAY. Currently the, what’s called the Y12 model for ages 
12  to  15,  is  restricted  to  a  top  speed  of  30  miles  per  hour.  And, 
that’s  a  performance-based  restriction  that  is  in  the  ANSI  vol-
untary  standard,  the  industry  standard.  We’ve  also  agreed,  Sen-
ator,  in  our  action  plans  that  we  negotiated  with  the  CPSC  not  to 
market  ATVs  larger  than  90cc  engine  displacement  for  anyone 
younger than 16. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. So, like on your Y12, I guess when I see that 

title, Y12, I think it’s for 12 years old and up, is that—— 

Mr. MURRAY. That’s correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  In  other  words,  so  you  think  it’s  OK  for  12 

year olds and older to drive a Y12? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  On  properly  sized  units  that  are  speed  restricted. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. And let me just ask about zero-tolerance on 

alcohol use for drivers. Do you all have a position on that? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Absolutely.  Our  main  on-product  label  has  an  icon 
that  shows  no  alcohol,  drugs  when  you  operate  this  vehicle.  That’s 
also  part  of  our  general  safety  instructions,  it’s  in  our  DVDs,  it’s 
emphasized in our hands-on training program, and all of our safety 
literature. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  on  paved  roads,  that’s  another  one  of  their 

issues. Do you all have a position on—— 

Mr.  MURRAY.  We  recommend  against  operating  ATVs  on  paved 

roads. These are off-road vehicles. 

Senator PRYOR. And, do you do that in the safety video or in the 
owner’s  manual  or  on  stickers  on  the  vehicle  or  all  of  the  above? 
Mr.  MURRAY.  All  of  the  above.  If  you  were  to  take  a  look  at  our 
main ATV label, again, there’s an icon right up at the very top that 
has  a  slash  through.  It’s  a  road,  a  slash  that  says  ‘‘Never  operate 
on paved roads.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

Senator PRYOR. Ms. Weintraub, let me ask you on the paved road 
issue.  Is  it  your  position  or  your  organization’s  position  that  they 
should  never  be  allowed  on  paved  roads?  Or  that  there  should  be 
warning  labels  and  that  the  manufacturer  should  recommend  that 
they not be allowed? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  We  believe  that  ATVs  should  not  be  driven  on 

paved roads. 

Senator PRYOR. At all? 
Ms. WEINTRAUB. At all. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Let  me  ask,  I  assume  that  protective  gear, 
both  of  you  all  agree  on  that.  What  about,  Mr.  Murray,  carrying 
passengers.  I  assume  the  industry  position  be  as,  if  an  ATV’s  not 
designed for passengers, you would say no passengers. 

Mr. MURRAY. That’s correct. And, that’s been our consistent mes-
sage. There are some units available on the market today that are 
designed  for  an  operator  and  a  passenger,  but  for  those  that  are 
single-operator  vehicles,  again,  we  have  on-product  labels  specific 
to the passenger warning and it’s also reiterated in the main label. 
So that both the operator of the vehicle can see it, and then there’s 
a label that’s back where a passenger might mount the unit so that 
the passenger can see, independently, that they shouldn’t be doing 
that. 

Senator PRYOR. And, Ms. Weintraub’s organization also said that 
ATVs should not be operated before sunrise or after sunset. What’s 
the industry position on that? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  We  recommend  against  children  under  16  oper-
ating ATVs after sunset and, in fact, the current industry standard 
prohibits  having  headlights  on  youth  models,  specifically  for  that 
purpose. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Mr. MURRAY. Adult-sized ATVs that have headlights on them, we 
have  warnings  and  instructions  in  our  owner’s  manuals  about  the 
extra  caution  that  should  be  taken  if  you  find  yourself  out  on  a 
trail  and  it  starts  to  get  darker.  You  need  to  slow  down,  you  need 
to  be  extra  cautious  in  getting  back  to  whatever  your  home  base 
is. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  I  will  say  this,  just  on  the  headlight  issue, 
for people who use them for hunting. A lot of times you go out be-
fore  the  sun  comes  up  and  get  yourself  positioned.  So  anyway,  we 
can talk about that further. 

Let’s see, looking through some of these other guidelines—— 
Ms.  Weintraub,  you  mentioned  something  about  Federal  lands. 
You  think  there  ought  to  be  a  set  of  prohibitions  or  requirements 
on Federal lands. 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Right.  Well,  given  the  various  rules  of  jurisdic-
tion, the Federal Government does not have jurisdiction broadly to, 
to  enact  some  of  these  regulations  across  the  board.  But,  the  Fed-
eral  Government,  obviously,  does  have  jurisdiction  over  Federal 
lands.  So,  our  thinking  is  that  Federal  land  should  be  a  paradigm 
of ATV safety. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Ms. WEINTRAUB. So, that was, our recommendation. And we have 
a  number  of  details  about  what  we  think  should  be  in  such  a 
standard  for  Federal  lands,  many  of  which,  you  just  stated  before. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Ms.  Weintraub,  let  me  ask  you  now  about 

three-wheel ATVs, as we call them, three-wheelers. 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Your  organization  takes  the  position  that  the 

sale of these should just be banned? 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. Right. 
Senator PRYOR. Should there be some sort of recall, or some sort 
of mechanism to try to get those out of the marketplace completely? 
And, if so, what should that look like? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  We  believe  there  should  be.  As  I’m  sure  you 
well  know,  the  part  of  the  consent  decree  that  CFA  felt  was  the 
strongest  aspect  was  the  provision  that  banned  the  production  of 
new three-wheel ATVs. But there still remain three-wheelers in the 
used  market.  And  recently,  there  have  been  some  importers  who 
may be bringing in three-wheel ATVs, as well. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  there  are  some  new  three-wheelers  hitting 

the market. 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  There  may  be.  There’s  been  some  advertising. 
I  don’t  know  if  they  have  been  seen  in  the  market,  but  the  older 
three-wheelers make up about 10 percent, still, of injuries. So, even 
though  they  have  been  banned  from  new  production  since  the  late 
1980s,  they’re  still  causing  problems  and  we’re  seeing  significant 
impact  of  them  in  the  death  and  injury  data.  So,  what  we  believe 
is a good solution is not only to make that ban permanent, but also 
to  recall  the  ATVs,  which  we  think  should  have  been  recalled  at 
the  time  of  the  consent  decree,  to  get  those  three-wheelers  off  the 
market. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  in  your  view,  how  would  the  recall  work? 
Would  the  manufacturers  have  to  refund  some  money,  would  they 
give  them  credit  for  the  purchase  of  a  four-wheeler?  I  mean,  how 
does that work? 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. I think it depends. We’re open to seeing how the 
details would work. The Consumer Product Safety Commission has 
mandatory  and  voluntary,  recall  authority,  and  it  rarely  uses  its 
mandatory  recall  authority.  So,  really  to  be  the  most  expeditious, 
the manufacturers would have to agree to a recall. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Mr.  Murray,  if  you  know,  do  you  have  an 
estimate  on  three-wheelers  still  out  there  in  the  U.S.  that  people 
are using? 

Mr. MURRAY. It’s a shrinking percentage. I know that and I know 
that  there  are  some  folks  out  there  that  love  their  three-wheelers 
and  they’re  nursing  them  along.  They  haven’t  been  sold  as  new 
products  in  this  country  for  two  decades.  I  can  certainly  find  out 
that information and submit it to the record. 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 

The  last  survey  of  the  three-wheel  ATV  population  was  conducted  by  Heiden  As-
sociates  in  2001.  The  survey  found  that  the  number  of  three-wheel  ATVs  had  de-
clined  forty  percent  (40  percent)  between  1997  and  2001,  from  1.25  million  to 
750,000.  Assuming  the  same  rate  of  decline,  it  can  be  estimated  that  the  number 
of three-wheel ATVs has further decreased from 675,000 in 2002 to 405,000 in 2006. 
There  would  be  only  approximately  360,000  three-wheel  ATVs  in  use  by  the  end  of 
this year. 

According to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission’s most recent annual 
report of ATV-related accidents and fatalities (issued in December 2006), there were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

an estimated thirty-three (33) fatalities associated with three-wheel ATVs in 2004— 
the most recent year for which CPSC has provided such estimates. These 33 fatali-
ties  involving  three-wheel  ATVs  in  turn  represent  only  4  percent  (4  percent)  of  all 
CPSC’s  estimated  ATV-related  fatalities  in  2004.  Moreover,  this  percentage  can  be 
expected  to  decline  in  subsequent  years  in  view  of  the  continuing  decrease  in  the 
number of three-wheel ATVs in use. 

Senator PRYOR. I’m curious, she mentioned that the accidents or 
the  injuries  in  ATVs,  they  make  up  about  10  percent  of  the  stats 
there. I’m just curious if, I would think it would be, that 10 percent 
would be disproportionately high as compared to how many are ac-
tually out there. Because, you know, my understanding of a three- 
wheeler is it’s much less stable than a four-wheel ATV. I’d love for 
you  to  supplement  the  record  on  that.  We’ll  leave  the  record  open 
for a few days. 

Now,  Ms.  Weintraub,  let  me  ask  you  about  your  90cc  threshold 
for  adult-size  ATV  recommendation.  Does  that  mean  that  an  ATV 
will  not  be  sold  to  or  marketed  to  an  adult  that  is  smaller  than 
90cc? Tell me how that works? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  No,  well,  first  of  all,  90ccs  is  currently  the  de-
marcation  for  an  adult-sized  or  youth-sized  model.  Anything  over 
90ccs  is  considered  an  adult-sized  ATV.  And,  according  to  the  vol-
untary standards, including the voluntary action plans, adult-sized 
ATVs, which are defined using the 90cc—greater than 90cc thresh-
old—should not be sold for use for children. 

But there are two broad problems. The first problem is that we’re 
seeing,  anecdotally,  that  there’s  not  widespread  compliance.  Over 
the  past  years  we’ve  worked  with  a  number  of  reporters  who’ve 
done undercover surveys in different cities and both of them found 
that  nine  out  of  ten  dealers  would  knowingly  sell  an  adult-sized 
ATV  for  use  for  children.  So,  that’s  one  part  of  the  problem,  and 
that’s  why  we  filed  a  petition  with  the  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Commission.  Basically,  what  we  want  to  do  is  codify  this  90cc 
threshold  to  make  it  mandatory,  to  give  CPSC,  as  well  as  poten-
tially,  manufacturers,  the  tools  to  enforce  that  dealers  not  know-
ingly sell adult-sized ATVs for use for children. 

The  second  problem,  however,  is  that  both  the  voluntary  stand-
ards  in  their  draft  form,  as  well  as  the  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Commission  are  moving  away  from  this  90cc  demarcation.  They’re 
both,  the  CPSC  rulemaking,  as  well  as  the  ANSI  standard,  are 
moving  into  categorization  based  upon  speed  for  certain  ages  and 
we  have  many  concerns  about  that.  Mostly  that  it  will  be  putting 
the  industry  and  the  Government’s  imprimatur  on  children  riding 
even faster ATVs than they’re allowed to now. And, there’s no evi-
dence  supporting  the  fact  that  children  could  safely  operate  ATVs 
at  the  speeds  given  in  these  categorizations.  Rather,  the  justifica-
tion has been solely based on consumer preference. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. Mr. Murray, let me ask you about one of the 
recommendations  from  Ms.  Weintraub’s  organization  to  establish 
minimum stability requirements for ATVs. Does that cause a prob-
lem with the industry? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Well,  it  does  in  so  far  as  these  vehicles  are  rider 
active.  I  don’t  know,  Senator,  if  you’ve  ridden  one,  but  you  shift 
your weight and you’re taught to do that, that’s part of our training 
course.  And,  as  a  consequence,  we  spent  a  lot  of  time  with  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

CPSC  back  in  the  late  1980s  and  the  early  1990s  trying  to  see  if 
we  could  develop  stability  measurement  that  would  be  applicable 
to these products. And, we weren’t able to do that. 

But at the same time, the Commission has twice studied the inci-
dence of rollovers involving the products and they’ve not been able 
to  find  a  correlation  between  stability  and  accidents.  And  so,  even 
in  their  most  recent  review  of  ATVs,  the  Commission  is  not  sug-
gesting that there’s any issue with the lateral stability of the ATVs, 
or any need for the adoption of a lateral stability measurement. 

One  of  the  benefits  of  this  proposed  bill  though,  Senator,  is  that 
if  with  product  innovation  and  if  with  further  research  it  turned 
out that there was a basis to have a valid measurement of, or sta-
bility  coefficient  for  ATVs,  the  Commission  would  be  able  to  take 
any  industry  standards  that  are  developed  in  that  area  and  incor-
porate them as part of the mandatory rule. So, we think it’s better 
left  to  the  standard-setting  process.  We  haven’t  been  able  to  crack 
that  nut  so  far,  but  if  we  ever  did,  this  bill  would  have  the  flexi-
bility to allow it to become part of a mandatory rule. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. Mr. Murray, I think it was you in your open-

ing statement, mentioned Internet sales. 

Mr. MURRAY. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Especially  from  these  imported  ATVs?  Do  you 
think the Federal Government should either ban or regulate Inter-
net sales? 

Mr. MURRAY. Not at all, but I do think that by enacting the draft 
legislation  the  Congress  would  be  able  to  codify  that,  if  you’re  a 
company selling ATVs in the United States, you have to follow age 
restrictions  that  are  appropriate  for  children  in  this  country.  And, 
you  have  to  comply  with  those,  whatever  retail  outlet  or  distribu-
tion channel you’re using. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. Ms. Weintraub, do you have a view of Inter-

net sales? Should we either ban them or regulate them? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  I  certainly  think  there  are  some  inherent  prob-
lems  with  complying  with  even  the  current  ATV  action  plans  in 
selling  them  on  the  Internet.  For  example,  how  do  you  know  what 
age rider will be using them? I mean, obviously, there are problems 
in brick and mortar stores as well, but there definitely seems to be 
more barriers to finding out the age of the rider. 

Further, there’s other information, there are other forms that are 
currently  being  used  that  would  have  to  be  signed  and  back  and 
forth,  so  I  think  it  would  complicate  things.  And,  I  think  it  could 
potentially make or irresponsible buying, even more possible. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Let  me  ask  you,  Ms.  Weintraub,  this  graph 
that  they  put  up  about  the  increasing  number  and  market  share 
of imports, Do you accept those numbers? 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. I don’t know. I saw the report, I don’t know, I’m 
not familiar with the entity that came up with them, so I’m not in 
a position to agree or disagree. The numbers seem high. 

And  as  I  said,  we  certainly  don’t  want  to  allow  a  problem  in 
terms, of deaths and injuries with these import issues to bubble up. 
We’d like to thwart the potential hazards before they occur, but we 
also want to actually deal with the documented problems caused by 
all ATVs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Let  me  make  sure  I  understand  your  posi-
tion  though,  Ms.  Weintraub.  On  the  safety  requirements  for  im-
ported ATVs, do you think that the imported ATVs should meet the 
same  safety  standards  that  the  domestically  produced  ATVs  meet? 
Ms. WEINTRAUB. We do, but it’s a little bit complicated for us, be-

cause we have concerns with the current standards. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Ms. WEINTRAUB. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  understand,  but  at  a  minimum  you  think  that 
they, all the imported ones should meet the same standards as the 
domestic. 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Sure.  If  we  could  improve  the  action  plans,  im-
prove  the  voluntary  standards,  yes,  certainly  there  should  be  a 
level playing field. Certainly. 

Senator  PRYOR.  In  other  words,  back  when  the  consent  decree 
was  entered  into,  your  organization  was  not  completely  supportive 
of that consent decree, you felt like it fell short in some areas? But, 
with that said, there were some good things in it also? 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Yes,  especially  the  ban  on  production  of  new 

three-wheelers, yes. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Now  you’ve  also,  in  your  testimony,  I  think  you 
mentioned  dealer  compliance.  As  I  understand  it,  the  dealer  com-
pliance  has  gone  down  since  the  sun-setting  of  the  consent  decree. 
I  think  that’s  correct,  at  least  that’s  my  understanding.  How  can 
we 
from  your  standpoint,  Ms. 
Weintraub? 

improve  dealer  compliance, 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Well,  we  think  that  the  best  solution  to  dealer 
compliance  is,  instead  of  it  being  voluntary,  making  it  mandatory, 
so  that  there  will  be  consequences  for  lack  of  compliance.  It  will 
give  manufacturers  tools  to  make  sure  that  their  dealers  are  not 
knowingly  selling  the  wrong-sized  ATV  for  children  and  posing 
them at greater risk. 

Senator PRYOR. In other words, not to put words in your mouth, 
but  you’d  like  to  see  a  Federal  law,  with  some  teeth  in  it,  that  re-
quires the dealers to do certain things. 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR. Is that fair to say? 
Mr.  Murray,  let  me  ask  you.  As  I  understand  the  statistics, 
you’ve seen—we have seen in this country an increase in the num-
ber  of  accidents  and  injuries  and  deaths  related  to  ATVs.  As  I  un-
derstand  the  statistics,  that  is  not  purely  based  on  an  increased 
number  of  ATVs  in  the  U.S.  today.  What  other  factors  might  play 
into that? 

Mr. MURRAY. Well, let me speak to that because we certainly feel 
that  any  ATV  injury  is  one  too  many,  but  there  has  been  a  dra-
matic  growth  in  the  number  of  ATVs  in  use.  And,  despite  this  in-
crease, the number of ATV injuries involving children under 16 de-
creased  10  percent  from  2004  to  2005  and  that’s  according  to  the 
CPSC’s latest ATV report. 

Senator PRYOR. So, does that mean in 1 year, it—— 
Mr. MURRAY. Yes, there was a 10 percent drop in the number of 

ATV-related accidents involving children under 16. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Do  you  think  that’s  part  of  a  trend  of  do  you 

think that was—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Mr. MURRAY. I sure hope so. 
Senator PRYOR.—one you’re. What would cause that trend if they 

are going down in the younger? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  I  think  the  concerted  efforts  of  the  CPSC,  and  the 
industry, to continue to raise awareness about the risks of children 
operating adult-size ATVs. Ninety percent, over 90 percent of inju-
ries  to  kids  are  occurring  when  they’re  operating  adult-size  ATVs. 
And so, through consumer advocate groups like CFA and the Acad-
emy and the industry getting that message out, I think people are 
hearing  it,  and  they’re  responding  to  it,  and  we’re  starting  to  see 
it in the accident data, which is very encouraging. 

It’s  still  too  high  and  so  we  want  to  keep  those  efforts  up.  And 
we’re  very  concerned  that  when  you  have  one-third—and  rapidly 
growing—of  the  market  that  is  totally  unregulated.  I’m  not  aware 
of  any  other  instance  where  two-thirds  of  a  market  is  regulated 
and  following  actions  that  are  good  for  consumer  safety,  and  one- 
third  is  just  completely  unregulated.  So,  we’ve  got  to  stem  that 
problem and this bill would do that. 

Senator PRYOR. Now you mentioned that the numbers have gone 
down 10 percent, for the younger ages, but what about in the gen-
eral population? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  When  you  look  at  the  adjusted  population,  the  in-
jury  risk  per  10,000  vehicles  has  declined  almost  10  percent  since 
2001 and it’s at its lowest point since 1998. 

Senator PRYOR. Ms. Weintraub, do you agree with that? 
Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Well,  statistics  can  be  interpreted  in  many  dif-
ferent ways. According to the CPSC, the raw numbers, there’s been 
an increase across the board in terms of people who’ve been injured 
as  well  as  people  who  have  been  killed.  And,  there’s  been  statis-
tically significant increases since 2001, for example, in terms of in-
juries, there’s been a 24 percent increase, so from 2001 to the most 
recent data. 

Since  2001,  there’s  been  a  statistically  significant  increase  of  18 
percent  in  the  number  of  children  under  16  seriously  injured  by 
ATVs. So, this problem continues to be epidemic, families’ lives are 
irreparably and tragically affected by ATV deaths and injuries. And 
this number, these numbers are a cause of great concern, which is 
why  CFA,  American  Academy  of  Pediatrics,  and  other  organiza-
tions are working so hard to try to stem this tide. 

We  see  the  statistic  that  90  percent  of  children  who  are  injured 
on ATVs that are—they’re actually injured on adult-size ATVs. We 
see that statistic as showing that the current system, the voluntary 
approach, is not working. And in looking at that statistic, our anal-
ysis  is,  well,  what  can  we  do  to  keep  kids  off  of  adult-size  ATVs? 
And, it seems that laws with consequences would help that. Unfor-
tunately, what the industry and the CPSC are doing, saying, ‘‘Well, 
let’s change the definition of ATVs, and let’s put kids on ATVs that 
actually go even faster.’’ 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Mr. MURRAY. Senator, could I comment on that? 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Mr. MURRAY. We’re looking at what’s being called a Transitional 
Model ATV, but we’re doing it at the request of CPSC. CPSC asked 
industry  and  other  interested  parties  to  consider  whether  the  cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

rent  90cc  restriction  should  be  abandoned.  Because  we’re  finding, 
and  we’re  hearing  from  parents,  we’re  hearing  from  kids,  we’re 
hearing  from  dealers  that  when  you  get  to  be  14  or  15  years  old, 
the 90cc unit is just too small. And, kids are not willing to operate 
it,  they  want  to  be  on  the  adult-sized  ATV.  We  don’t  want  them 
on adult-sized ATVs. 

And  so,  what  we’ve  done  is  we  hired  a  human  factors  firm  to 
work  with  our  engineers,  they’ve  studied  this  issue,  we’ve  sub-
mitted  this  information  to  the  CPSC,  and  what’s  being  proposed 
would be a transitional model that would be a little bit larger, bet-
ter  size  and  fit  for  an  adolescent.  It  would  be  set  at  20  miles  per 
hour  coming  from  the  factory  and  it  would  require  a  specialized 
tool  that  parents  could  use,  over  time,  to  increase  the  speed  to  30 
miles  an  hour,  and  ultimately  to  38  miles  an  hour,  to  allow  kids 
to learn how to operate them, to demonstrate their skills and their 
judgment. None of that’s going to replace the need for adult super-
vision, but the CPSC is studying that proposal and I’m sure they’re 
going to get some other proposals because this is a tough issue. 

This bill would preserve the ability of CPSC ultimately to decide, 
in  its  expert  judgment,  whether  this  is  a  good  idea  or  not.  And  if 
it’s a good idea, then they would be able to incorporate that as part 
of the mandatory rule. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Mr.  Murray,  when  you  were  giving  the  sta-

tistics a few minutes ago—— 

Mr. MURRAY. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.—you  quantified  what  you  said  by  a  number  of 
incidents  or  injuries  per  10,000  ATVs.  In  other  words,  is  it  your 
contention  that  even  though  what  Ms.  Weintraub  says  is  true 
about  the  raw  data,  when  you  put  it  in  the  context  of  the  number 
of  ATVs  in  the  U.S.  today,  you’re  saying  your  statistics  show  that 
the  numbers  are  actually  going  down?  Not  the  raw  numbers, 
but—— 

Mr.  MURRAY.  Right.  These  aren’t  my  statistics,  they’re  the 
CPSC’s,  and  it  comes  from  the  CPSC’s  2005  Annual  Report.  It 
shows that in, between 2004 and 2005 the number of accidents in-
volving  children  under  16  dropped  10  percent,  so  that’s  just  the 
raw  number.  The  second  figure  that  I  referred  to,  was  when  you 
do  adjust  to  population  and  so  you’re  evening  that  out  and  you’re 
looking at per 10,000 ATVs in use. The accident rate has also fallen 
10 percent between 1999 and 2005. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Well,  we’ll  look  at  those  statistics  and—— 
Mr.  MURRAY.  And,  I’ll  be  happy  to  submit  a  copy  of  this  CPSC 

report for the record if it would be helpful. 

Senator  PRYOR.  That’d  be  great.  We  probably  have  it,  but  we’ll 

make sure if we don’t we’ll request it. 

As  you  said,  Ms.  Weintraub,  with  statistics,  you  know,  they 

can—— 

Ms.  WEINTRAUB.  Well,  actually  all  of  our  data  is  from  the  same 

document, so it’s just what we’re highlighting. 

Senator PRYOR. Well, it’s the way you interpret it, as well. 
Ms. WEINTRAUB. Right. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  mean,  it’s  kind  of  what  you  want  to  focus  on 

and—— 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. Exactly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

Senator  PRYOR .—how  you  interpret  that.  Let  me  ask  a  couple 

more questions here, then I’m going to let you go. 

Mr.  Murray,  beyond  the  legislation  that  would  require  the  so- 
called  level  playing  field,  where  the  imports  have  to  comply  with 
the  same,  it  sounds  like  you  are  willing  to  discuss  other  require-
ments  in  law  and  it  sounds  to  me  like  you’re,  you  know,  both  of 
you  have  said  that  you’re  willing  to  try  to  find  common  ground  on 
a  variety  of  other  issues.  I’m  not  trying  to  put  words  in  your 
mouth, but is that fair? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  It  is  fair.  For  example,  Senator,  after  our  discus-
sions  with  CFA—I  believe  it  was  last  November  or  December—we 
agreed to include a provision in the draft bill that would ban sales 
of new three-wheel ATVs. We also specified some additional safety 
requirements for certain ATV components and characteristics. And 
then,  as  we’ve  outlined  in  our  position  statements,  there  are  a 
number of areas where we have agreement in principle. If it makes 
sense to include something in this bill and the Committee believes 
it’s  within  its  jurisdiction,  we  continue  to  be  willing  to  work  on  it, 
but  we’re  concerned  that,  we  were  here  a  year  ago.  In  that  time-
frame, another 400,000 noncompliant ATVs were imported into the 
U.S.  and  this  year  we’re  going  to  reach  over  half  a  million.  So  we 
don’t  want  good  ideas  to  sacrifice  the  urgent  need  for  getting  this 
legislation enacted, and enacted quickly. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  ask  you  about  your  voluntary  action 

plans? 

Mr. MURRAY. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Are  those  consistent  across  the  industry  or  does 
one  manufacturer  do  one  thing  and  another  do  another,  and  vice 
versa? 

Mr.  MURRAY.  The  domestic  and  foreign  companies  that  have 
signed  onto  these  action  plans  have  signed  on  to  substantially  the 
same  requirements.  And  these  were  all  published  in  the  Federal 
Register by the CPSC. The companies, in fact, were commended by 
the agency for having kept these provisions in place. And the prob-
lem  we’ve  had,  Senator,  as  you  know,  is  so  many  new  companies 
have  come  in  and,  despite  repeated  efforts  by  the  agency  to  get 
them  to  sign  on  to  these  same  action  plans,  they  have  refused  to 
do so. And this bill would make it a Federal requirement, that they 
get  with  the  program.  And,  I  think  any  responsible  manufacturer 
who wants to participate in this market has no excuse for not doing 
so. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Mr.  Murray,  I  know  that  you  have  a  sense 
of urgency about trying to get some legislation done, but from your 
standpoint, would more meetings with the consumer groups, would 
that  be  beneficial?  Is  there  value  in  doing  that?  Do  you  feel  that 
with—and I’m not saying more time like months and months—but 
just  more  time  together  as  you  all  are  trying  to  work  through 
issues, do you think you could find more common ground? 

Mr. MURRAY. I think there are certainly areas where we can con-
tinue to work together. I think that as to this bill, we’ve now given 
the  Subcommittee  the  areas  where  we’ve  reached  agreement  or 
where  we  have  reached  an  impasse,  but  the  issue  of,  for  example, 
Federal  lands.  We  think  that  the  safe  practices  of  ATV  use  should 
be followed whether you’re on public land, private land, State land, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Federal  land.  That’s  an  area  where,  if  we  can  work  with  CFA  and 
the Academy and other interested parties, with Interior or with the 
Department of Agriculture, we’re prepared to do that. 

There’s a lot that needs to be done at the State level. For exam-
ple, Oklahoma just passed a law that requires kids operating ATVs 
to wear helmets. We all agree that needs to be done. Our industry 
has  been  the  leading  advocate  of  State  ATV  safety  legislation. 
We’ve  been  encouraged  that  CFA  is  also  supportive  of  that.  That’s 
an area where we can continue to meet and work together. 

This bill is so clearly needed. One-third of this industry is totally 
unregulated  and  the  enactment  period  under  the  draft  that  we’ve 
been  discussing  is  a  5-month  window.  So,  by  the  time  that  hap-
pens, Senator, another half million of these noncompliant ATVs are 
going to be in the United States. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Ms.  Weintraub,  do  you  think  there’s  benefit  in 
you  all  sitting  down  further,  and  discussing  further,  or  do  you 
think you kind of reached the point of diminishing returns? 

Ms. WEINTRAUB. Yes, I think there is—although I think the doc-
uments that your Committee has received very much articulate the 
positions of both sides: there are areas where we agree. And I think 
what  would  be  beneficial  would  be  to  work  out  those  areas  and 
come  up  with  language.  Because  we  have,  agreed  on  principle, 
philosophically,  so  getting  to  that  next  stage  would  be  productive. 
I  just  want  to  mention  also,  that  we  certainly  feel  urgency  as 
well. We look, not necessarily in terms of the market, but in terms 
of the number of children and, adults as well, who are injured and 
killed.  And  we  fear  that  if  this  train  is  moving  and  does  not  cover 
all  ATVs,  then  we’ve  missed  a  golden  opportunity.  So,  we  want  to 
make  sure  that  any  legislation  deals  with  the  broader  issues  as 
well. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Great.  Well  listen,  I  want  to  thank  both  of  you 
all for coming. This has been very informative and even though we 
had  a  vote  in  the  middle  of  this  and  a  lot  of  committees  going  on, 
we’ll  definitely  share  this  information  with  other  Committee  mem-
bers, and many of their staffs are here represented right now. 

What we’ll do is, we’ll leave the record open for 2 weeks. It’s pos-
sible some Senators would like to do some follow-up questions with 
you, so don’t be surprised if you get some written questions. 

But, I want to thank you all for attending today, and being here. 
And  again,  this  has  been  informative  and  helpful  for  the  Sub-
committee.  And,  if  there’s  nothing  further,  I’ll  go  ahead  and  ad-
journ us. 

Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 3:42 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE HON. NORM COLEMAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

I would like to thank Chairman Pryor for convening today’s hearing on ATV safe-
ty  issues  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  provide  the  Committee  with  a  Min-
nesota perspective on this matter. 

Minnesota  is  home  to  two  innovative  and  competitive  manufacturers  of  ATVs— 
Arctic Cat and Polaris. To date, these companies have been pioneers in the develop-
ment  of  various  ATV  safety  features  and  have  made  numerous  design  changes  to 
enhance the safety performance of their machines. In my discussions with the lead-
ership  of  both  companies  I  have  been  impressed  with  their  commitment  to  pro-
tecting the safety and security of ATV riders, especially youth riders. 

It is for this reason that I have been a strong advocate of legislation that requires 
that  all  ATVs  comply  with  a  baseline  safety  standard.  For  years,  Minnesota’s  ATV 
manufacturers  have  promoted  and  implemented  an  extensive  array  of  safety  initia-
tives to reduce injuries and deaths on ATVs, including the offer of incentives to con-
sumers to take hands-on safety training. These initiatives have been thoroughly vet-
ted and analyzed by the Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC). 

Minnesota’s  manufacturers  have  been  forced  to  compete  against  a  surge  of  im-
ports from South Korea, Taiwan and China that have not been subject to any regu-
latory  oversight.  These  ‘‘new  entrants’’  have  capitalized  on  the  explosion  of  con-
sumer  support  for  ATVs  by  selling  directly  to  the  consumer  and  not  requiring  that 
retailers  provide  safety  information  about  the  products.  The  result  is  that  nearly 
one-third  of  the  sales  to  consumers  in  2007  will  be  by  manufacturers  who  do  not 
offer  the  consumer  the  training  which  riders  should  complete  to  safely  use  these 
products.  While  this  impacts  Minnesota  manufacturers,  the  biggest  concern  is  for 
consumers  who  have  the  right  to  expect  that  all  ATVs  sold  in  this  country  meet  a 
minimum  safety  standard.  Sales  of  ATVs  that  do  not  meet  minimum  safety  stand-
ards will hurt the consumer and ultimately the entire ATV industry. 

Last  year,  the  CPSC  initiated  a  rulemaking  proceeding  that  will  eventually  lead 
to  a  new  standard  governing  the  safety  of  ATVs.  However,  the  new  standard  may 
not  be  finalized  for  several  years.  In  the  interim,  the  new  entrants  will  continue  to 
sell products to American consumers that do not meet the established industry’s vol-
untary  product  standard  and  do  not  contain  all  of  the  safety  information  or  free 
safety training. 

As I stated last year, the existing regulatory regime is broken and must be fixed. 
All  ATV  manufacturers  should  be  bound  by  the  same  standards  and  oversight. 
Adopting legislation which codifies the ANSI standard as a baseline until the CPSC 
adopts a more comprehensive standard is critically needed and long overdue. 

With  respect  to  the  ANSI  standard  setting  process,  in  the  next  few  weeks,  ANSI 
will publish a new standard that not only will contain the existing requirements for 
brakes,  suspension  and  many  other  design,  configuration  and  performance  aspects 
of  ATVs,  but  also  will  include  requirements  for  on-product  labels,  operator’s  manu-
als,  hang  tags  and  compliance  certification  labels.  These  additional  provisions  in-
clude  important  ATV  safety  information  which  would  be  required  to  be  provided 
with  each  ATV.  This  new  standard  is  more  comprehensive  than  the  current  stand-
ard, and compliance by all manufacturers with the new standard will result in safer 
products for consumers. 

In closing, thank you for your leadership on this most important consumer safety 
issue.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  on  this  matter  in  the  weeks  and  months 
ahead. 

Æ 
(29) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  15:01 Sep 30, 2010 Jkt 039697 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\39697.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

